dictsource/mnc_rules
.group o
        o          0
     _) o          0
     X) o          0#
    _h) o          0
     X) o ($w_alt3+++ %0#
     _) o' (P2     %oU       // prefix
        o'er       o@
        o (Ba_     'oU
     _) o (Bal     oU
    XC) o (Bal     oU
     X) o (By_     oU
     _) o (Cy+     0
        o (Be#     oU
        oi (ce#    OI
        o (BeCo_   0
        o (BenC    oU
        o (Beon    'oU
        o (BiA     oU
        o (Bing    oU
    XC) o (Bus_    oU
        o (Cagh_   oU
        o (Cemic   0
        o (Cet_    0
        o (Ci_     'oU
        o (Cic_    '0
        o (Cical   '0
        o (Co_     'oU
        o (Coist   'oU
        o (_       oU
    ig) o (_       oU
   @@C) o (_       =oU
        oa         oU
        oa (_      'oU@
        oa (b      oUa
     g) oa (n_     oU@
     z) oa (n_     'oU@
    br) oa (d      O:
        oar        o@
        oar (_     o@
    cr) o (at      oU
     X) o (ba      oU
    _t) o (bac     @
        o (bed     oU
     _) o (beis    %oU
    _r) o (ber     0
     _) o (bes     %oU
        o (bic_    'oU
     n) o (bil     oU
    _m) o (bil     oU
    gl) o (bin     'oU
        o (bje     %0
     _) o (bl      %0#
     _) o (blat    %oU
     n) o (bl      oU
        o (bliga   0
        o (bligato %0#
        o (blo     0
    _r) o (bo      oU
     _) o (bs      %0
?3   _) o (bs      %0#
     _) obs (er    %0bz
?3   _) obs (er    %0#bz
        obso (l    0bs@
        o (bstin   0
     _) o (bt      %0
?3   _) o (bt      %0#
        o (by_     oU
     f) o (cA      oU
    _l) o (cA      oU
    _v) o (cA      oU
    ff) o (cA      @
     l) o (cat     %oU
     _) o (ccasi   @
     _) o (cclu    @
        ocean      oUS@n
        ocean (ic  oUSIan
     X) o (ct      0
        occur      @k3:
?5      occur      @kVR
        occurr     @k3:
?5      occurr     @kVR
    tr) och        oUk
     d) o (cil     oU
   &%C) ock (_     @k
     l) o (com     ,oU
        ocrates (_ '0kra#ti:z
        o (cre_    'oU
     _) octo (@    0kt@
 pickp) o (cket    ,0
    _h) o (cu      oU
    cr) o (cu      oU
        o (cyte_   =@
     _) o (dA      oU
    _b) o (dy      0
  cust) o (d       @
     k) o (dA      oU
  meth) o (d_      @
  peri) o (d_      @
     d) o (dec     %oU
     m) o (del     0
     m) o (der     0
     m) o (dest    0
  cust) o (di      'oU
        odor       oUd3
    mm) o (dor     @
        odo (rA    oUd@
        odour      oUd3
     &) o (dy_     @
     b) o (dy_     0
        oe         oU
  hydr) o (e       oU
    sh) oe (+      u:
        oea (_     'i@
     _) oe (d      i:
        oe (m_     oUI
?3      oe (m_     oUI#
        oer        oU3
     _) oe (s      i:
     &) oe (s_S2   z
        oesopha    I2s0f@
     d) oer (_     u:3
     p) oe (t      oUI
     f) oe (tA     i:
     p) oe (ti     oUE
        oe (ve     ,oU'E
?3   &) o (ff      O
?3   _) o (ff      O
?3   c) o (ff      O
        of (fen    @
        o (ffic    0
        o (ffici   @
?3      o (ft      O
        o (gan_    oU
    @l) oge (_     0g
     &) o (gen_    @
        ogeni (c   oUdZ'EnI
        o (genat   '0
        o (genous  '0
        o (geny    '0
     r) o (ger     0
     l) ogism      =@dZIz@m
     l) ogne (_    'oUn
     @) ographer   '0gr@f3
     _) og (re     oUg
     r) ogu (L04   oUg
     v) ogu (L04   oUg
    @@) ogue       0g
    @l) og (y      =@dZ
    @l) og (ist_   =@dZ
        og (etic   @dZ
        oh         oU
        o (hA      oU
     j) oh (n      0
        oi         OI
        oi (na_    'OI
        oia        OI@
        oi (c      oUI2
        oi (c_     'oUI2
        oi (ce     OI
        oi (ck     OI
     A) oi (zA     oUaI
        oiy (A_    'OI
        o (imag    oU
     c) o (inci    %oU
        o (ing     oU
     d) o (ing     u:
        oir        wA@
        oire       wA@
     @) ois (_     wA:
     u) ois (_     OI
    rt) oise       @s
   orp) oise       @s
        o (ism     oU
     @) o (ist     oU
        oix (_     wA:
    tr) o (jan     oU
        o (ku      oU
        o (ky_     oU
?3   g) o (ng      O
?3   r) o (ng      O
?3   s) o (ng      O
     t) o (ngu     V
        o (que_    oU
        o (shA_    oU
    _C) o (ti      oU
        o (tion    oU
     m) o (x       @
        o (x++     0
        ox (ide    '0ks
        oxy        0ksI
  hydr) oxy        '0ksI
     _) oxy (@@    ,0ksI2
     _) oxy (g     0ksI
        oy         OI
        oy (A_     'OI
     d) o (zen     V
     _) o (zo      oU


.group ol
   &st) ol (_      @L
     _) ol (aX     oUl
        ol (and_   oUl
        ol (ar     oUl
    @@) ol (ar     'oUl
     h) ol (ar     0l
    _c) ol (b      oUl
     m) ole (st    @lE
     c) olor       Vl3
     c) ol (our    Vl
    @@) ol (us     'oUl
 contr) ol         oUl
   ext) ol         oUl
   _id) ol         @L
   _id) ol (a      '0l
  petr) ol (_      @L
     s) ol (em     0l
     &) ol (i_     0l
     s) ol (ic     @l
     s) ol (il     @l
     t) ol (er     0l
     m) ol (ec     @l
     m) ol (ecule  0l
     &) ol (enC    @l
        old        oUld
     w) olf        Ulf
     p) olice      @li:s
    &p) olis       =@lIs
     p) ol (ite    @l
     p) oli (tec   ,0lI
     s) ol (idi    @l
     f) ol (k      oU
    _p) ol (ka     oUl
     y) ol (k      oU
     n) oll        oUl
     p) oll (u     @l
     r) oll        oUl
    tr) oll (A     0l
   car) oll        @l
    br) oll        0l
     t) oll        oUl
    at) oll        0l
     w) oll        oUl
        olm (_     oUm
     @) ol (o_     @l
        olo (gi    '0l@
        olo (gic   @l'0
     &) ol (ous_   @l
     _) ol (sAn_   oUl
    _b) ol (st     oUl
        olt        oUlt
     v) olt        oUlt
     v) ol (C      0l
     w) olv        Ulv
   N_p) oly        ,0lI
     _) ol (ym     @l

.group om
     &) om (_      @m
        om (_$w_alt1+ 0m
     c) om (_      0m
     c) om (pan    Vm
     r) om (_      0m
     n) om (ad     oUm
     t) oma (to    @mA:
     c) omb (_     oUm
     t) omb (K     u:m
     w) omb (_     u:m
     c) ombe (_    u:m
   _tr) ombo (n    %0mboU
     c) om (e      Vm
     c) omm (e     Vm
    _d) om (a      @m
     d) om (est    @m
     d) om (ini    @m
  @@in) ome (_     'oUmeI
  phil) om (e      @m
        ometer (_  '0mIt3
     @) ome (tre   '0mI
     @) ome (try   '0m@
     &) omer (_    @m3
     c) omer (_    Vm3
    gl) om (er     0m
    _p) om (e      0m
    _s) ome        Vm
     s) om (e_     Vm
     s) ome (th    'Vm
    st) omach      Vm@k
     r) om (an     oUm
     r) oman (ti   oUm'an
   chr) om         oUm
   chr) ome        oUm
     w) oma (n     Um@
     w) ome (n     ImI
     _) om (iC     %oUm
    br) om (i      oUm
     _) om (in     0m
     d) omin (o    0mIn
     &) om (ise_   =@m
     &) om (ize_   =@m
     @) om (ist_   =@m
    _s) om (na     %0m
     _) omni (@@P4 ,0mnI2
     _) omni       0mnI
     _) omnipo     0mn'Ip@
     _) omni (sc   0mn'I
     &) om (orph   =@m   
     &) om (ous_   @m
     &) omy (_     =@m%i

.group on
    @@) on (_      @n
     @) on (_$w_alt2 @n
        on (_$w_alt1+ 0n
?8   @) on (_++    0n
   &%C) on (_      @n
    &b) on (_      @n
    &c) on (_      @n
    Cd) on (_      @n
?3  ag) on (_      0n
    rg) on (_      @n
    &i) on (_      @n
    &k) on (_      @n
    &s) on (_      @n
    &t) on (_      @n
   &tr) on (_      0n
//    hl) on (_      @n
    nl) on (_      @n
   &el) on (_      @n
    &m) on (_      @n
     p) on (_+     0n
    ar) on (_      @n
    dr) on (_      @n
    or) on (_      0n
    cr) on (_      0n
    &x) on (_      @n
  phot) on         @n
  pers) on         @n
  pers) on (i      '0n
 postp) on         'oUn
   _sp) on         0n
    &s) on (an     @n
        on (ald    0n
     &) on (age_   @n
     d) on (at     %oUn
        on (an_    oUn
     _) on (io     Vn
    ec) on (d      @n
     m) on (d_     @n
    _l) on (don    Vn
    &C) oned (_S2v d
    &C) oning (_S3v I2N
     _) one        w02n
     _) once (_    w02ns
     g) on (e      0n
     &) on (er_    @n
    ex) on (er     0n
    ph) on (eti    @n
    _h) on (ey     Vn
     n) on (e      0n
    _m) on (C      0n 
     m) one (ta    VnI
?3   m) one (ta    0nI
     m) one (ti    0nI2
     _) one (r     oUn@
     m) on (ey     Vn
   und) one (_     Vn
?!3  m) ong (er    VNg
?3  &m) ong (er    ,0Ng
     m) ong (ous   VNg
        on (i_     'oUn
     &) onism (_   =@nIz@m
     &) onist (_   =@nIst
     @) on (ica    '0n
    _m) on (k      Vn
    _p) on (y      oUn
   _sp) on (g      Vn
    fr) on (t      Vn
     m) on (th     Vn
     &) onous      @n@s
        onus       oUn@s
     w) on         Vn
     w) on (k      0n
     w) on (t      0n
     &) ony (_     @n%i
        onymous    '0nIm@s
        on (ze#    0n

.group oo
        oo         u:
     h) ood        Ud
     h) oo (k      U
     w) ood        Ud
     h) ood        Ud
    bl) oo (d      V
    fl) oo (d      V
    st) oo (d      U
     g) ood        Ud
        oog (ie_   u:g
?3      oog (ie_   Ug
     C) oo (k      U
     k) oo (k      u:
     p) oo (k      u:
     &) oo (n      'u:
     m) oo (n_     u:
    sp) oo (n_     u:
     f) oo (t      U
     s) oo (t      U
     s) oo (th     u:
     w) oo (l      U
    _c) oo (p      oU'0
        oor        o@
     _) oo (r      u:
        oor (_     o@
    _m) oor        U@
     p) oor        U@
     c) oor (d     oU'O@
        oos (e     u:s
    ch) oose       u:z
    ch) oos (en    oUz
     g) oose       u:s
        oot (ic_   u:'0t
